District of Columbia statutes.
31-1131.05b

Pre-licensing education for title insurers.

(a)

The Commissioner may require, by rule, that an individual, not exempt under subsections (b), (c), or (d) of this section, complete a pre-licensing course of study before:

(1)

Taking the examination required by § 31-1131.05; or

(2)

Applying for an insurance producer license.

(b)

An attorney who holds a license to practice law in any state or the District of Columbia shall be exempt from pre-licensing course of study requirements and examination requirements.

(c)

An title agent insurance applicant who provides certification from a title insurance insurer that the agent has had signing authority on policies or title insurance commitments for the past 3 years relating to properties located within the District of Columbia shall be exempt from the pre-licensing course of study requirements and the examination requirements; provided, that the certification is submitted to the Commissioner within one year after September 24, 2010.

(d)

A full-time employee of a title insurer shall be exempt from the pre-licensing course of study requirement.

(e)

The District of Columbia Land Title Association, or other organization designated by the Commissioner by rule, shall provide to each individual whose duties will include selling, soliciting, or negotiating a title insurer’s limited line of title insurance in the District a program of instruction that is approved by the Commissioner. The insurer shall provide the program of instruction to the individual prior to the individual’s application for licensure as a limited lines insurance producer.

History

Mar. 27, 2003, D.C. Law 4-264, § 5b
as added Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 2166(3), 57 DCR 6242
Nov. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 20-40, § 6(a), 60 DCR 12304

Section References

This section is referenced in § 31-1131.05.

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-40 substituted “may” for “shall” in the introductory language of (a).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 2166(3) of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).